src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_utf8_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 370 Y 7
SFX 370 0 ُوهُ/161 . 253
SFX 370 0 ُوهُما/161 . 253
SFX 370 0 ُوهُم/161 . 253
SFX 370 0 ُوها/161 . 253
SFX 370 0 ُوهُنَّ/161 . 253
SFX 370 0 ُونِي/161 . 253
SFX 370 0 ُونا/161 . 253
SFX 365 Y 5
SFX 365 0 وْكَ/150 . 269
SFX 365 0 وْكِ/150 . 269
SFX 365 0 وْكُما/150 . 269
SFX 365 0 وْكُم/150 . 269
SFX 365 0 وْكُنَّ/150 . 269
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 وْنَ/161 . 278
SFX 371 Y 5
SFX 371 0 ُوكَ/161 . 255
SFX 371 0 ُوكِ/161 . 255
SFX 371 0 ُوكُما/161 . 255
SFX 371 0 ُوكُم/161 . 255
SFX 371 0 ُوكُنَّ/161 . 255
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 وْنَ/150 . 278
SFX 445 Y 7
SFX 445 0 ُونَهُ/177 . 279
SFX 445 0 ُونَهُما/177 . 279
SFX 445 0 ُونَهُم/177 . 279
SFX 445 0 ُونَها/177 . 279
SFX 445 0 ُونَهُنَّ/177 . 279
SFX 445 0 ُونَنِي/177 . 279
SFX 445 0 ُونَنا/177 . 279
SFX 372 Y 1
SFX 372 0 ُونَ/161 . 259
SFX 587 Y 2
SFX 587 0 نِي/178 . 231
SFX 587 0 نا/178 . 231
SFX 433 Y 7
SFX 433 0 ُونَهُ/166 . 279
SFX 433 0 ُونَهُما/166 . 279
SFX 433 0 ُونَهُم/166 . 279
SFX 433 0 ُونَها/166 . 279
SFX 433 0 ُونَهُنَّ/166 . 279
SFX 433 0 ُونَنِي/166 . 279
SFX 433 0 ُونَنا/166 . 279
SFX 446 Y 5
SFX 446 0 ُونَكَ/177 . 280
SFX 446 0 ُونَكِ/177 . 280
SFX 446 0 ُونَكُما/177 . 280
SFX 446 0 ُونَكُم/177 . 280
SFX 446 0 ُونَكُنَّ/177 . 280
SFX 119 Y 13
SFX 119 0 َتا/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاهُ/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاهُما/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاهُم/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاها/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاهُنَّ/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاكَ/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاكِ/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاكُما/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاكُم/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتاكُنَّ/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتايَ/146 . 281
SFX 119 0 َتانا/146 . 281
SFX 321 Y 5
SFX 321 0 ه/179 . 236
SFX 321 0 هما/179 . 236
SFX 321 0 هم/179 . 236
SFX 321 0 ها/179 . 236
SFX 321 0 هنَّ/179 . 236
SFX 434 Y 5
SFX 434 0 ُونَكَ/166 . 280
SFX 434 0 ُونَكِ/166 . 280
SFX 434 0 ُونَكُما/166 . 280
SFX 434 0 ُونَكُم/166 . 280
SFX 434 0 ُونَكُنَّ/166 . 280
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 َة/159 . 246
SFX 262 Y 45
SFX 262 0 َته/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتهما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتهم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتها/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتهنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتكَ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتكِ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتكُما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتكُم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتكُنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِي/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتنا/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُهُ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُهُما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُهُم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُها/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُهُنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُكَ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُكِ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُكُما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُكُم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُكُنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتُنا/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَهُ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَهُما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَهُم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَها/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَهُنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَكَ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَكِ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَكُما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَكُم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَكُنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتَنا/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِهِ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِهِما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِهِم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِها/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِهِنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِكَ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِكِ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِكُما/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِكُم/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِكُنَّ/162 . 282
SFX 262 0 َتِنا/162 . 282
SFX 322 Y 5
SFX 322 0 كَ/179 . 239
SFX 322 0 كِ/179 . 239
SFX 322 0 كُما/179 . 239
SFX 322 0 كُم/179 . 239
SFX 322 0 كُنَّ/179 . 239
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 0 0/159 . 229
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 َةِ/162 . 270
SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 0 َتانِ/146 . 230
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 0/180 . 229
SFX 111 Y 45
SFX 111 0 آته/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتهما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتهم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتها/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتهنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتكَ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتكِ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتكُما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتكُم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتكُنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِي/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتنا/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُهُ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُهُما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُهُم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُها/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُهُنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُكَ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُكِ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُكُما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُكُم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُكُنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتُنا/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِها/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكَ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكِ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكُما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكُم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكُنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِنا/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِها/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِهِنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكَ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكِ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكُما/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكُم/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِكُنَّ/146 . 258
SFX 111 0 آتِنا/146 . 258
SFX 108 Y 2
SFX 108 0 آتِ/146 . 244
SFX 108 0 آتِ/146 . 244
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 ات/159 . 256
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 ُوا/152 . 283
SFX 451 Y 7
SFX 451 0 وْنَهُ/177 . 248
SFX 451 0 وْنَهُما/177 . 248
SFX 451 0 وْنَهُم/177 . 248
SFX 451 0 وْنَها/177 . 248
SFX 451 0 وْنَهُنَّ/177 . 248
SFX 451 0 وْنَنِي/177 . 248
SFX 451 0 وْنَنا/177 . 248
SFX 441 Y 1
SFX 441 0 ُوا/177 . 232
SFX 600 Y 1
SFX 600 0 0/167 . 229
SFX 452 Y 5
SFX 452 0 وْنَكَ/177 . 252
SFX 452 0 وْنَكِ/177 . 252
SFX 452 0 وْنَكُما/177 . 252
SFX 452 0 وْنَكُم/177 . 252
SFX 452 0 وْنَكُنَّ/177 . 252
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 آتُ/146 . 261
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 0 0/170 . 268
SFX 543 Y 7
SFX 543 0 َّهُ/173 . 284
SFX 543 0 َّهُما/173 . 284
SFX 543 0 َّهُم/173 . 284
SFX 543 0 َّها/173 . 284
SFX 543 0 َّهُنَّ/173 . 284
SFX 543 0 َّنِي/173 . 284
SFX 543 0 َّنا/173 . 284
SFX 537 Y 7
SFX 537 0 َّهُ/181 . 284
SFX 537 0 َّهُما/181 . 284
SFX 537 0 َّهُم/181 . 284
SFX 537 0 َّها/181 . 284
SFX 537 0 َّهُنَّ/181 . 284
SFX 537 0 َّنِي/181 . 284
SFX 537 0 َّنا/181 . 284
SFX 343 Y 2
SFX 343 0 نِي/148 . 231
SFX 343 0 نا/148 . 231
SFX 355 Y 1
SFX 355 0 ِي/182 . 285
SFX 220 Y 1
SFX 220 0 َةٍ/169 . 272
SFX 544 Y 5
SFX 544 0 َّكَ/173 . 286
SFX 544 0 َّكِ/173 . 286
SFX 544 0 َّكُما/173 . 286
SFX 544 0 َّكُم/173 . 286
SFX 544 0 َّكُنَّ/173 . 286
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 آتٌ/158 . 237
SFX 538 Y 5
SFX 538 0 َّكَ/181 . 286
SFX 538 0 َّكِ/181 . 286
SFX 538 0 َّكُما/181 . 286
SFX 538 0 َّكُم/181 . 286
SFX 538 0 َّكُنَّ/181 . 286
SFX 532 Y 7
SFX 532 0 هُ/183 . 263
SFX 532 0 هُما/183 . 263
SFX 532 0 هُم/183 . 263
SFX 532 0 ها/183 . 263
SFX 532 0 هُنَّ/183 . 263
SFX 532 0 نِي/183 . 263
SFX 532 0 نا/183 . 263
SFX 57 Y 22
SFX 57 0 َّهُ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّهُما/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّهُم/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّها/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّهُنَّ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّكَ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّكِ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّكُما/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّكُم/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّكُنَّ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّنِي/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 َّنا/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاهُ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاهُما/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاهُم/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاها/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاهُنَّ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاكَ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاكِ/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاكُما/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاكُم/152 . 287
SFX 57 0 ّاكُنَّ/152 . 287
SFX 555 Y 7
SFX 555 0 َّهُ/157 . 284
SFX 555 0 َّهُما/157 . 284
SFX 555 0 َّهُم/157 . 284
SFX 555 0 َّها/157 . 284
SFX 555 0 َّهُنَّ/157 . 284
SFX 555 0 َّنِي/157 . 284
SFX 555 0 َّنا/157 . 284
SFX 549 Y 7
SFX 549 0 َّهُ/184 . 284
SFX 549 0 َّهُما/184 . 284
SFX 549 0 َّهُم/184 . 284
SFX 549 0 َّها/184 . 284
SFX 549 0 َّهُنَّ/184 . 284
SFX 549 0 َّنِي/184 . 284
SFX 549 0 َّنا/184 . 284
SFX 556 Y 5
SFX 556 0 َّكَ/157 . 286
SFX 556 0 َّكِ/157 . 286
SFX 556 0 َّكُما/157 . 286
SFX 556 0 َّكُم/157 . 286
SFX 556 0 َّكُنَّ/157 . 286
SFX 550 Y 5
SFX 550 0 َّكَ/184 . 286
SFX 550 0 َّكِ/184 . 286
SFX 550 0 َّكُما/184 . 286
SFX 550 0 َّكُم/184 . 286
SFX 550 0 َّكُنَّ/184 . 286
SFX 63 Y 12
SFX 63 0 ُوهُ/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوهُما/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوهُم/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوها/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوهُنَّ/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوكَ/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوكِ/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوكُما/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوكُم/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُوكُنَّ/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُونِي/152 . 288
SFX 63 0 ُونا/152 . 288
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 0 0/185 . 229
SFX 239 Y 45
SFX 239 0 آته/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتهما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتهم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتها/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتهنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتكَ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتكِ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتكُما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتكُم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتكُنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِي/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتنا/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُهُ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُهُما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُهُم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُها/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُهُنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُكَ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُكِ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُكُما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُكُم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُكُنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتُنا/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِها/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكَ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكِ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكُما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكُم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكُنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِنا/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِها/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِهِنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكَ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكِ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكُما/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكُم/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِكُنَّ/158 . 258
SFX 239 0 آتِنا/158 . 258
SFX 442 Y 7
SFX 442 0 ُوهُ/177 . 253
SFX 442 0 ُوهُما/177 . 253
SFX 442 0 ُوهُم/177 . 253
SFX 442 0 ُوها/177 . 253
SFX 442 0 ُوهُنَّ/177 . 253
SFX 442 0 ُونِي/177 . 253
SFX 442 0 ُونا/177 . 253
SFX 221 Y 45
SFX 221 0 َته/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتهما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتهم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتها/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتهنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتكَ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتكِ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتكُما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتكُم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتكُنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِي/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتنا/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُهُ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُهُما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُهُم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُها/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُهُنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُكَ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُكِ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُكُما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُكُم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُكُنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتُنا/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَهُ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَهُما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَهُم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَها/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَهُنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَكَ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَكِ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَكُما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَكُم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَكُنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتَنا/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِهِ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِهِما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِهِم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِها/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِهِنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِكَ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِكِ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِكُما/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِكُم/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِكُنَّ/169 . 282
SFX 221 0 َتِنا/169 . 282
SFX 202 Y 1
SFX 202 0 َة/156 . 246
SFX 569 Y 5
SFX 569 0 ه/185 . 236
SFX 569 0 هما/185 . 236
SFX 569 0 هم/185 . 236
SFX 569 0 ها/185 . 236
SFX 569 0 هنَّ/185 . 236
SFX 219 Y 1
SFX 219 0 َةِ/169 . 270
SFX 443 Y 5
SFX 443 0 ُوكَ/177 . 255
SFX 443 0 ُوكِ/177 . 255
SFX 443 0 ُوكُما/177 . 255
SFX 443 0 ُوكُم/177 . 255
SFX 443 0 ُوكُنَّ/177 . 255
